District of Columbia statutes.
2-361.06

Rules.

(a)

(1)

The CPO, pursuant to subchapter I of Chapter 5 of this title [§ 2-501 et seq.], shall issue rules to implement the provisions of this chapter, except subchapter VI of this chapter.

(2)

The Department of Real Estate Services, pursuant to subchapter I of Chapter 5 of this title [§ 2-501 et seq.], shall issue rules to implement the provisions of subchapter VI of this chapter.

(b)

The existing procurement rules, to the degree that they are consistent with this chapter, shall remain in effect until they are superseded by rules issued in accordance with subsection (a) of this section.

(c)

A District government procurement rule or regulation promulgated pursuant to this chapter shall not change in any way a contractual commitment by the District government or of a contractor to the District government which was in existence on the effective date of the rule or regulation.

History

Apr. 8, 2011, D.C. Law 18-371, § 1106, 58 DCR 1185